Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4501
Rental company; collect fee; when;
use; effect on growth limit on budget; collection.

(1) Except
as provided in subsection (6) of this section, rental companies engaged in
the business of renting private passenger motor vehicles used to carry fifteen
passengers or less for periods of thirty-one days or less shall collect, at
the time the vehicle is rented in Nebraska, a fee not to exceed five and seventy-five hundredths percent
of each rental contract amount, not including sales tax. For purposes of this
section, a vehicle is rented in Nebraska if it is picked up by the renter
in Nebraska. The fee shall be computed in accordance with the method used
for the sales tax imposed by the state on those charges subject to sales tax.
The fee shall not be subject to sales tax. The fee shall be noted in the rental
contract and collected in accordance with the terms of the contract. The fee
shall be retained by the vehicle owner or the rental company engaged in the
business of renting private passenger motor vehicles. Fees collected pursuant
to this section shall be used by the vehicle owner or the rental company for
reimbursement of the amount of motor vehicle taxes and fees imposed and paid
in Nebraska upon the vehicles by the vehicle owner or rental company.

(2) On February 15 of each year, the fees imposed by this section for
the preceding calendar year, to the extent the fees exceed the motor vehicle
taxes and fees imposed and paid in Nebraska upon the vehicles for the preceding
calendar year, shall be due and payable to the county treasurer of the county
where the transactions occurred. The fee shall be remitted on forms prescribed
by the county treasurer. The county shall allocate and distribute such proceeds
in the same manner as the proceeds from motor vehicle taxes are allocated
and distributed pursuant to section 60-3,186. The revenue received by the
county under this section may be expended for any lawful purpose.

(3) The revenue received by the county under this section shall be included
and considered as proceeds of motor vehicle taxes and fees for purposes of
any growth limitation on budgets of political subdivisions funded by property
taxes.

(4) The fee imposed under this section shall be in addition to any other
tax or fee authorized by law to be levied on the business activities described
in this section and shall be in addition to the sales tax imposed by the state
or any municipality.

(5) The county treasurer, county board, and county sheriff may use any
method specified in Chapter 77, article 17, for the collection of property
taxes to collect the fee imposed by this section.

(6) A fee shall not be collected if the renter is exempt from the payment
of sales tax.

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 79;

Laws 1993, LB 346, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1083, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 52;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 279;

Laws 2014, LB251, § 1.